Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1497.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1799.2(a) and (c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1799.2. Driver improvement course discounts.(a) Motor vehicle driver improvement course.--All insurance companies authorized to write private passenger automobile insurance within this Commonwealth shall provide a premium discount for each motor vehicle on a policy under which all named insureds are 55 years of age or older and have successfully completed a motor vehicle driver improvement course meeting the standards of the Department of Transportation. This discount shall apply to all coverages for all policy periods beginning within the [three-year] five-year period immediately following the successful completion of the course and shall be approved by the commissioner as part of the insurer's rate 12345678910111213141516171819 filing, provided that such discount shall not be less than 5%. The successful completion of more than one course within a [three-year] five-year period does not qualify the insured for additional discounts. The premium discount required by this subsection may be omitted upon demonstration to the commissioner in an insurer's rate filing that the discount is duplicative of a driver improvement course discount provided by the insurer.* * *(c) Continuing eligibility.--Each participant shall take an approved course every [three] five years to continue to be eligible for the discount on insurance. Each insurer may require, as a condition of providing and maintaining the discount, that the insured for a [three-year] five-year period after course completion:(1) not be involved in an accident for which the insured is chargeable;(2) not be convicted of an offense enumerated in section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points); and(3) not be convicted or have accepted Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition (ARD) for driving under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to insurance policies issued or renewed in this Commonwealth after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1497PN1754 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526